Indiana, session 2026, SB142.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-9-30 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 30. Delaware County Hospitality Tax Board
Consolidation Ordinance
Sec. 0.5. This chapter applies only to Delaware County.
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "consolidated entity" means a
board resulting from the adoption of an ordinance under section
4 of this chapter to consolidate the functions of each former entity
into the consolidated entity.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "executive" has the meaning set
forth in IC 36-1-2-5.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "former entity" means a board,
bureau, commission, authority, or any other similar entity
authorized to administer funds received from the county:
(1) innkeeper's tax imposed under IC 6-9-18; or
(2) food and beverage tax imposed under IC 6-9-21.
SB 142—LS 6364/DI 129


Sec. 4. The county executive may adopt an ordinance to
consolidate the functions of a former entity with respect to the
administration of funds received from the county:
(1) innkeeper's tax imposed under IC 6-9-18; or
(2) food and beverage tax imposed under IC 6-9-21;
into a single consolidated entity as designated in the ordinance to
administer funds received from both of those taxes.
Sec. 5. If an ordinance is adopted under section 4 of this chapter,
each former entity is abolished on the date the ordinance is
adopted and may not exercise any of the powers, duties, or
responsibilities conferred on the former entity under IC 6-9-18 or
IC 6-9-21. In addition, the term of any individual serving on each
former entity ends on the date the ordinance is adopted. The
consolidated entity designated in the ordinance shall exercise the
functions of each abolished former entity.
Sec. 6. (a) If an ordinance is adopted under section 4 of this
chapter, the county executive may determine the number of
members to serve on the consolidated entity, which must be an odd
number. All members appointed to the consolidated entity must
reside in the county. The county executive shall determine:
(1) the qualifications to be appointed to the consolidated
entity, which may not include consideration of political party
affiliation;
(2) the term of a member, which may not exceed four (4)
years, but may provide for:
(A) the staggering of the terms of members initially
appointed to the consolidated entity;
(B) reappointment following the expiration of a member's
term; and
(C) the filling of vacancies if a vacancy occurs;
(3) the grounds for removal;
(4) the number of members required for a quorum; and
(5) any other matters that the county executive determines
reasonably relate to the composition of the consolidated
entity.
A member of the consolidated entity may not receive a salary or
benefits. However, a member of the consolidated entity is entitled
to reimbursement for necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of the member's respective duties.
(b) Each member of the consolidated entity, before entering the
member's duties, shall take an oath of office in the usual form, to
be endorsed upon the member's certificate of appointment and
SB 142—LS 6364/DI 129


promptly filed with the clerk of the circuit court of the county.
Sec. 7. If an ordinance is adopted under section 4 of this chapter,
the ordinance is final and the county executive may not adopt a
subsequent ordinance to restore each former entity and transfer
the powers, duties, and responsibilities concerning the
administration of the innkeeper's tax imposed under IC 6-9-18 or
food and beverage tax imposed under IC 6-9-21 back to each
former entity.
Sec. 8. If an ordinance is adopted under section 4 of this chapter,
money in a fund established under a provision of IC 6-9-18 or
IC 6-9-21 on the date the ordinance is adopted remains in the fund
and is available to be administered and used by the consolidated
entity for the purposes allowed under IC 6-9-18 or IC 6-9-21.
Sec. 9. If an ordinance is adopted under section 4 of this chapter,
any bonds, leases, contractual agreements, or other obligations
issued, entered into, or in effect on or before the date the ordinance
is adopted are transferred to and assumed by the consolidated
entity.
Sec. 10. If an ordinance is adopted under section 4 of this
chapter, all records and property of each former entity are
transferred on the date the ordinance is adopted to the
consolidated entity.
Sec. 11. If an ordinance is adopted under section 4 of this
chapter, the county executive must immediately send a certified
copy of the ordinance to each of the following:
(1) The commissioner of the department of state revenue.
(2) The treasurer of state.
(3) The state comptroller.
Sec. 12. If an ordinance is adopted under section 4 of this
chapter, a reference to a former entity in IC 6-9-18, IC 6-9-21,
another statute, a rule, or any other document is considered a
reference to the consolidated entity.
SB 142—LS 6364/DI 129


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Tax and Fiscal Policy, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 142, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, line 4, delete "County Option Consolidation Ordinance" and
insert "Delaware County Hospitality Tax Board Consolidation
Ordinance".
Page 1, between lines 4 and 5, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 0.5. This chapter applies only to Delaware County.".
Page 1, line 13, delete "a county:" and insert "the county:
(1) innkeeper's tax imposed under IC 6-9-18; or
(2) food and beverage tax imposed under IC 6-9-21.".
Page 1, delete lines 14 through 16.
Page 2, line 2, delete "a county:" and insert "the county:
(1) innkeeper's tax imposed under IC 6-9-18; or
(2) food and beverage tax imposed under IC 6-9-21;
into a single consolidated entity as designated in the ordinance to
administer funds received from both of those taxes.".
Page 2, delete lines 3 through 7.
Page 2, line 11, delete "the applicable" and insert "IC 6-9-18 or
IC 6-9-21.".
Page 2, line 12, delete "chapter of this article.".
Page 2, line 36, delete "salary." and insert "salary or benefits.".
Page 3, line 6, delete "applicable innkeeper's tax or food and" and
insert "innkeeper's tax imposed under IC 6-9-18 or food and
beverage tax imposed under IC 6-9-21".
Page 3, line 7, delete "beverage tax".
Page 3, line 9, delete "any provision of another" and insert "a
provision of IC 6-9-18 or IC 6-9-21".
Page 3, line 10, delete "chapter of this article".
Page 3, line 12, delete "the applicable" and insert "IC 6-9-18 or
IC 6-9-21.".
Page 3, delete line 13.
Page 3, line 30, delete "in a" and insert "in IC 6-9-18, IC 6-9-21,
another".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 142 as introduced.)
HOLDMAN, Chairperson
SB 142—LS 6364/DI 129


Committee Vote: Yeas 11, Nays 0.
SB 142—LS 6364/DI 129